Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ATTENDANCE MARKETING CAMPAIGN.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Student attendance marketing campaign. new text end new text begin (a) To contract for a student attendance marketing campaign: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 250,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) The department must issue a request for proposals to develop and execute a three-year student attendance marketing campaign to raise awareness of the importance of student attendance and the consequences of absenteeism. The campaign must include information to help families overcome barriers to attendance and must be inclusive of all public school students. new text end new text begin (c) The department must award a contract to an organization that demonstrates capacity to reach wide and varied audiences of students and their families. The department may accept more than one proposal to develop and execute a marketing campaign. A proposal for a marketing campaign must include goals, planned statewide and targeted strategies, and a plan to objectively evaluate the impact of the campaign. new text end new text begin (d) Upon conclusion of the campaign, an organization that was awarded a contract must report to the department the goals of the campaign, strategies implemented, data demonstrating the outcomes, and how the money was used. new text end new text begin (e) The department may use no more than three percent of the appropriation to administer the request for proposals and contract under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (f) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end